South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4384.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  This act may be cited as the "South Carolina Farm Export Relief and Resilience Act." SECTION 2.  Title 46 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: CHAPTER 59 Farm Export Relief and Resilience Section 46-59-10.  (A) There is established in the State Treasury the South Carolina Farm Export Trade Relief Fund, to be administered by the South Carolina Department of Agriculture. (B) The fund must provide: (1) grants or low-income loans to eligible farmers whose operations have been negatively impacted by federal tariffs, international trade disruptions, or export bans; and (2) emergency working capital assistance for short-term operations, debt-servicing, and crop-transition support. (C) Eligible agricultural producers must demonstrate: (1) a significant portion of their income is derived from exports; and (2) a documented reduction in international market access, pricing, or demand due to federal action. (D) The Department of Agriculture must develop criteria, application procedures, repayment schedules for loans, and award guidelines in consultation with the State Treasurer and the South Carolina Agricultural Council. (E) An initial appropriation of ten million dollars is authorized to capitalize the fund, with additional appropriations as needed. Section 46-59-20.  The Department of Agriculture must: (1) partner with regional trade offices and federal agencies to open or expand new international markets for agricultural products of this State; (2) develop and promote value-added agricultural products for export; and (3) host international trade delegations and participate in global trade expositions to elevate the state's agricultural brand abroad. Section 46-59-30.  (A) The Department of Agriculture, in partnership with the South Carolina Department of Insurance and Clemson University Cooperative Extension, must develop a proposal for state-supported crop insurance enhancements to better protect farmers affected by trade disruptions. (B) These insurance enhancements may include: (1) premium subsidies for export-reliant crops; (2) supplemental coverage for price loss due to international trade policy shifts; and (3) pilot programs for climate-resilient and market-flexible crops. Section 46-59-40.  The Department of Agriculture must report annually to the General Assembly on: (1) fund disbursement and loan repayments; (2) progress in international market development; and (3) recommendations for future trade resilience strategies. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----